Illinois, session 104th, SB3461.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3-101 and 3-102 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 5/3-101)  (from Ch. 68, par. 3-101)7    Sec. 3-101. Definitions. The following definitions are 8applicable strictly in the context of this Article:9    (A) Real Property. "Real property" includes buildings, 10structures, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, 11interests in real estate cooperatives, condominiums, and 12hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest 13therein.14    (B) Real Estate Transaction. "Real estate transaction" 15includes the sale, exchange, rental or lease of real property, 16or any act that otherwise makes available such a transaction 17or alters a person's rights to real property. "Real estate 18transaction" also includes the brokering or appraising of 19residential real property and the making or purchasing of 20loans or providing other financial assistance:21        (1) for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing 22    or maintaining a dwelling; or23        (2) secured by residential real estate.  SB3461- 2 -LRB104 18900 JRC 32345 b1    (C) Housing Accommodations. "Housing accommodation" 2includes any improved or unimproved real property, or part 3thereof, which is used or occupied, or is intended, arranged 4or designed to be used or occupied, as the home or residence of 5one or more individuals.6    (D) Real Estate Broker or Salesman. "Real estate broker or 7salesman" means a person, whether licensed or not, who, for or 8with the expectation of receiving a consideration, lists, 9sells, purchases, exchanges, rents, or leases real property, 10or who negotiates or attempts to negotiate any of these 11activities, or who holds oneself out as engaged in these.12    (E) Familial Status. "Familial status" means one or more 13individuals (who have not attained the age of 18 years) being 14domiciled with:15        (1) a parent or person having legal custody of such 16    individual or individuals; or17        (2) the designee of such parent or other person having 18    such custody, with the written permission of such parent 19    or other person.20    The protections afforded by this Article against 21discrimination on the basis of familial status apply to any 22person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal 23custody of any individual who has not attained the age of 18 24years.25    (F) Conciliation. "Conciliation" means the attempted 26resolution of issues raised by a charge, or by the   SB3461- 3 -LRB104 18900 JRC 32345 b1investigation of such charge, through informal negotiations 2involving the aggrieved party, the respondent and the 3Department.4    (G) Conciliation Agreement. "Conciliation agreement" means 5a written agreement setting forth the resolution of the issues 6in conciliation.7    (H) Covered Multifamily Dwellings. As used in Section 83-102.1, "covered multifamily dwellings" means:9        (1) buildings consisting of 4 or more units if such 10    buildings have one or more elevators; and11        (2) ground floor units in other buildings consisting 12    of 4 or more units.13    (I) Immigration Status. "Immigration status" means a 14person's actual or perceived citizenship or immigration 15status. 16    (J) "Domestic violence" means "abuse", as defined in 17Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, by a 18"family or household member", as defined in Section 103 of the 19Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.20    (K) "Sexual violence" means any act of sexual assault, 21sexual abuse, or stalking of an adult or minor child, 22including, but not limited to, non-consensual sexual conduct 23or non-consensual sexual penetration as defined in the Civil 24No Contact Order Act and the offenses of stalking, aggravated 25stalking, criminal sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual 26assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of a child,   SB3461- 4 -LRB104 18900 JRC 32345 b1criminal sexual abuse, and aggravated criminal sexual abuse as 2those offenses are described in the Criminal Code of 2012. 3(Source: P.A. 103-232, eff. 1-1-24; 103-859, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (775 ILCS 5/3-102)  (from Ch. 68, par. 3-102)5    Sec. 3-102. Civil rights violations; real estate 6transactions and other prohibited acts. It is a civil rights 7violation for an owner or any other person, or for a real 8estate broker or salesman, because of unlawful discrimination, 9familial status, immigration status, source of income, history 10of experiencing domestic or sexual violence, or an arrest 11record, as defined under subsection (B-5) of Section 1-103, 12to: 13        (A) Transactions. Refuse to engage in a real estate 14    transaction or deny real property, or to discriminate in 15    making available such a transaction;16        (B) Terms. Alter the terms, conditions or privileges 17    of a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of 18    facilities or services in connection therewith;19        (C) Offers. Refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a 20    bona fide offer in a real estate transaction from a 21    person;22        (D) Negotiation. Refuse to negotiate a real estate 23    transaction with a person;24        (E) Representations. Represent to a person that real 25    property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or   SB3461- 5 -LRB104 18900 JRC 32345 b1    lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring 2    a property listing to the person's attention, or to refuse 3    to permit the person to inspect real property;4        (F) Publication of Intent. Make, print, circulate, 5    post, mail, publish or cause to be made, printed, 6    circulated, posted, mailed, or published any notice, 7    statement, advertisement or sign, or use a form of 8    application for a real estate transaction, or make a 9    record or inquiry in connection with a prospective real 10    estate transaction, that indicates any preference, 11    limitation, or discrimination based on unlawful 12    discrimination or unlawful discrimination based on 13    familial status, immigration status, source of income, or 14    an arrest record, or an intention to make any such 15    preference, limitation, or discrimination;16        (G) Listings. Offer, solicit, accept, use or retain a 17    listing of real property with knowledge that unlawful 18    discrimination or discrimination on the basis of familial 19    status, immigration status, source of income, or an arrest 20    record in a real estate transaction is intended.21        (H) Criteria. Use criteria or methods that have the 22    effect of subjecting individuals to unlawful 23    discrimination or discrimination based on familial status, 24    immigration status, source of income, or an arrest record 25    in a real estate transaction. Such criteria or methods are 26    unlawful under this subsection if they are not necessary   SB3461- 6 -LRB104 18900 JRC 32345 b1    to achieve a substantial, legitimate, non-discriminatory 2    interest; or if the substantial, legitimate, 3    non-discriminatory interest could be served by another 4    practice that has a less discriminatory effect. 5(Source: P.A. 102-896, eff. 1-1-23; 103-232, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-859, eff. 1-1-25.)